Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1290.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5703. Restricting the use of cash bail for pregnant defendants.(a) Restriction.--(1) There shall be a rebuttable presumption against imposing monetary conditions on a pregnant defendant who is not facing a capital offense or offense for which the maximum sentence is life imprisonment.(2) The defendant, at minimum, shall give verbal notice of the defendant's pregnancy status to the bail authority.(3) If a monetary condition has been imposed on a pregnant defendant, the bail authority shall state on the 12345678910111213141516171819 record or in writing the factual reasons why no lesser restrictive release conditions or combination of release conditions have been set and the facts that support a determination that the defendant has the ability to pay the amount of the monetary condition imposed.(b) Notice.--A pregnant defendant shall provide notice to the court by providing evidence of the pregnancy with a limited waiver of privilege. A positive pregnancy test, medical record, statement from a medical provider confirming pregnancy or a good faith statement contending a pregnancy made by the defendant shall constitute prima facie evidence of pregnancy.(c) Request for pregnancy test.--A defendant who may be pregnant and who is arrested and in custody in a county jail or correctional facility held on a monetary condition in pretrial detention may request a pregnancy test upon or following admission to the county jail or correctional facility. Staff at the county jail or correctional facility shall provide a pregnancy test upon request and allow the defendant to take the pregnancy test within 24 hours of the request at no cost to the defendant.(d) Confidentiality.--The court shall protect the medical information provided to the court as confidential medical information. A defendant's waiver of medical privilege to present medical evidence of pregnancy in court is limited to information relevant to determine whether the defendant is pregnant.(e) Misrepresentation.--Misrepresenting a defendant's status as a pregnant defendant is a false statement under 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 4902 (relating to perjury) and 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).20260SB1290PN1607 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Pregnant defendant." A person who is pregnant and who has been accused of a crime."Pretrial detention." The period a defendant is held in custody in a county jail or correctional facility between arrest and trial.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1290PN1607 - 3 - 123456789